Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-405 Original petition; minors;
preliminaries to hearing. (a) Upon the filing of a petition to establish
a conservatorship or for another protective order for the reason that the
respondent is a minor, the court shall set a date for hearing. If the court
determines at any stage of the proceeding that the interests of the minor are
or may be inadequately represented, it may appoint a lawyer to represent the
minor, giving consideration to the choice of the minor if the minor has
attained fourteen years of age.

(b) While a petition to establish a
conservatorship or for another protective order is pending, after preliminary
hearing and without notice to others, the court may make orders to preserve and
apply the property of the minor as may be required for the support of the minor
or individuals who are in fact dependent upon the minor. The court may appoint
a special conservator to assist in that task. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next